Utah statutes.
78B-15-607.   Limitation -- Child having presumed father.
(1)  Paternity of a child conceived or born during a marriage with a presumed
father as described in Subsection 78B-15-204(1)(a), (b), or (c), may be raised
by the presumed father or the mother at any time prior to filing an action for
divorce or in the pleadings at the time of the divorce of the parents.
(a)  If the issue is raised prior to the adjudication, genetic testing may be
ordered by the tribunal in accordance with Section 78B-15-608.  Failure of the
mother of the child to appear for testing may result in an order allowing a
motherless calculation of paternity.  Failure of the mother to make the child
available may not result in a determination that the presumed father is not
the father, but shall allow for appropriate proceedings to compel the
cooperation of the mother.  If the question of paternity has been raised in
the pleadings in a divorce and the tribunal addresses the issue and enters an
order, the parties are estopped from raising the issue again, and the order of
the tribunal may not be challenged on the basis of material mistake of fact.
(b)  If the presumed father seeks to rebut the presumption of paternity, then
denial of a motion seeking an order for genetic testing or a decision to
disregard genetic test results shall be based on a preponderance of the
evidence.
(c)  If the mother seeks to rebut the presumption of paternity, the mother has
the burden to show by a preponderance of the evidence that it would be in the
best interests of the child to disestablish the parent-child relationship.
(2)  For the presumption outside of marriage described in Subsection
78B-15-204(1)(d), the presumption may be rebutted at any time if the tribunal
determines that the presumed father and the mother of the child neither
cohabited nor engaged in sexual intercourse with each other during the
probable time of conception.
(3)  The presumption may be rebutted by:
(a)  genetic test results that exclude the presumed father;
(b)  genetic test results that rebuttably identify another man as the father
in accordance with Section 78B-15-505;
(c)  evidence that the presumed father and the mother of the child neither
cohabited nor engaged in sexual intercourse with each other during the
probable time of conception; or
(d)  an adjudication under this part.
(4)  There is no presumption to rebut if the presumed father was properly
served and there has been a final adjudication of the issue.
